Maine, session 132, LD1299.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2017 is enacted to read:
§2017. Prohibition on unsecured storage of handgun in motor vehicle
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Handgun" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 554-B, subsection 1,
paragraph A.
B. "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2,
subsection 17.
C. "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 42.
2. Prohibition. A person may not intentionally or knowingly store a handgun in an
unoccupied motor vehicle unless:
A. The handgun is stored out of plain view in a locked hard-sided container; and
B. The motor vehicle, including the trunk, is locked.
3. Penalty. Except as provided in subsection 4, a person who violates subsection 2
commits a civil violation for which a fine of not less than $200 and not more than $500
may be adjudged, except that a person who violates subsection 2 after having previously
been adjudicated as violating subsection 2 commits a civil violation for which a fine of not
less than $500 and not more than $1,000 may be adjudged.
4. Exceptions. The prohibition in subsection 2 does not apply to the storage of a
handgun by the following persons:
A. A law enforcement officer;
B. A person who possesses a valid hunting license or permit issued by the Department
of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife and is engaged in hunting activities authorized by that
license or permit;
C. A person engaged in the instruction of a hunter education program or handgun
safety program offered or facilitated by the Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife pursuant to Title 12, section 10108; and
D. A person who is a member of the National Guard or the Reserves of the United
States Armed Forces and is under an order to active duty.